Utah statutes.
41-1a-802.   Identification number inspectors -- Duties.

(1)  The following are qualified identification number inspectors:

(a)  the commission;

(b)  designated officers and employees of the division;

(c)  a person operating a safety inspection station under Title 53, Chapter 8, Part 2, Motor Vehicle Safety Inspection Act;

(d)  an official inspection station certified inspector;

(e)  a dealer licensed under Subsection 41-3-202(1), (2), (3), or (4); and

(f)  all peace officers of the state.

(2)  The qualified identification number inspectors shall, upon the application for the first registration in this state of any vehicle:

(a)  inspect the identification number of the vehicle;

(b)  make a record of the identification number inspection upon an application form provided by the division; and

(c)  verify the facts in the application.



Amended by Chapter 32, 2005 General Session

